incubator/apertium-lt-en.lt.dix
    <pardef n="tė/tis__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čio</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiui</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tį</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tyje</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiu</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tis</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čių</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiams</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čius</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiuose</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiai</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiais</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čiai</l>
          <r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="deguon/is__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iui</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>į</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="šird/is__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žiai</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>į</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ži</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ims</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yse</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imis</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="av/is__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>į</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imi</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ių</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ims</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yse</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imis</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="solo__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="širdis"><i>šird</i><par n="šird/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="anglis"><i>angl</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="krateris"><i>krater</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tūkstantmetis"><i>tūkstantme</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lūšis"><i>lūš</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="amerikietis"><i>amerikie</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="akis"><i>ak</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="paukštis"><i>paukš</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="avis"><i>av</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lapkritis"><i>lapkri</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="geležis"><i>gelež</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="paskirtis"><i>paskir</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="deguonis"><i>deguon</i><par n="deguon/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="padėtis"><i>padėt</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="esperanto"><i>esperanto</i><par n="solo__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="solo"><i>solo</i><par n="solo__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nosis"><i>nos</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vokietis"><i>vokie</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rugpjtis"><i>rugpj</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="europietis"><i>europie</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tėtis"><i>tė</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skystis"><i>skys</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ausis"><i>aus</i><par n="av/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dienoraštis"><i>dienoraš</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
